Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2804
Accelerated State Highway Capital Improvement Program; created.

The Accelerated State Highway Capital Improvement Program is created. The department shall administer the program using funds from the Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund. The purpose of the program is to accelerate capital improvement projects to provide the earliest possible mobility, freight, and safety benefits to the state, thereby accelerating enhancements to the state’s economy and the quality of life of the general public. The department shall develop the program. The projects eligible for funding under the program include construction of the expressway system and federally designated high priority corridors and needs-driven capacity improvements across the state.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 4.
June 30, 2033